Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CITY OF DELANO SESQUICENTENNIAL.new text end new text begin $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the city of Delano for the Delano Sesquicentennial to celebrate the city's 150th anniversary in 2026 and to provide art, music, and cultural heritage programming. new text end